Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4030.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Employ" means engage, permit, or allow to work. (b) "Employer" means a person, firm, or corporation that employs a minor, and includes the this state or a political subdivision of the this state, an agency or instrumentality of the this state, and an agent of an employer. (c) "Issuing officer" means any of the chief following: (i) The chief administrator of a school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, or nonpublic school, or a person authorized by that chief administrator in writing to act on his or her the chief administrator's behalf. (ii) For a minor being educated under section 1561(3)(f) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1561, the minor's parent or legal guardian. (d) "Issuing officer of the school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, or nonpublic school at which the minor is enrolled" includes a minor's parent or legal guardian if the minor is being educated under section 1561(3)(f) of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1561. (e) (d) "Minor" means a person under 18 years of age. (f) (e) "Rule" means a rule promulgated pursuant to under the administrative procedures act of 1969, Act No. 306 of the Public Acts of 1969, being sections 24.201 to 24.328 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.